Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.050

Articles and bylaws to director.

The incorporators shall deliver to the director triplicate originals of the articles of incorporation and duplicate copies of its proposed bylaws.

[ 1994 c 92 s 427; 1982 c 3 s 16; 1981 c 302 s 30; 1945 c 235 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-125. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 6; 1890 p 56 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.